Wisconsin, session 2025, SB202.
do enact as follows:SB202,13Section 1. 66.0601 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB202,1,4466.0601 (1) (d) Guaranteed income program. 1. In this paragraph:SB202,2,25a. “Guaranteed income program” means a program under which individuals 6are provided with regular periodic cash payments that are unearned and that may 1be used for any purpose. “Guaranteed income program” does not include a program 2under which an individual is required to perform work or attend training.SB202,2,33b. “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.SB202,2,742. No political subdivision may expend moneys of the political subdivision, 5including shared revenue payments under subch. I of ch. 79, moneys raised by 6levying taxes, or fee revenues, for the purpose of making payments to individuals 7under a guaranteed income program.SB202,2,88